Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2218
Clerk magistrates; assignment of matters.

Assignment of matters arising under the Nebraska Probate Code to clerk magistrates shall be subject to sections 24-519 and 24-520.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 18, UPC § 1-309;

Laws 1977, LB 167, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 46.